Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-604.08
District; reorganization, consolidation, or merger; directors; continue to serve term.

In the event of a reorganization, consolidation, or merger of any district or districts, directors of the districts involved and who are in office at the time of such reorganization, consolidation, or merger may continue to serve as directors of the resulting reorganized, consolidated, or merged district until the expiration of the term of office for which such person or persons have been elected and until his or their successors are elected and qualified.

Laws 1967, c. 418, § 14, p. 1292;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 579.